Massachusetts, session 194th, H1750.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 7 of chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after the first sentence in the second paragraph, 
the following sentence:- The appropriate law enforcement agency responsible for notice to the 
defendant shall notify the victim when a temporary or permanent abuse prevention order: (i) has 
been successfully served; (ii) has not been successfully served within 12 hours of receipt of the 
order from the court, and every 24 hours thereafter until service is complete or the court orders 
otherwise, and the effect of non-service on the order’s validity; or (iii) has expired or otherwise 
become ineffective. 
SECTION 2. Section 9 of chapter 258E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting, after the first sentence in the second paragraph, the following sentence: 

of 2 11 The appropriate law enforcement agency responsible for notice to the defendant shall notify the 
victim when a temporary or permanent harassment prevention order: (i) has been successfully 
served; (ii) has not been successfully served within 12 hours of receipt of the order from the 
court, and every 24 hours thereafter until service is complete or the court orders otherwise, and 
the effect of non-service on the order’s validity; or (iii) has expired or otherwise become 
ineffective. 
SECTION 3. Section 43 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is amended 
by inserting, in line 21, after the word “vacate” the following words:- , harassment prevention.  
SECTION 4. Said section 43 of said chapter 265 is hereby further amended by inserting, 
in line 26, after the words “two hundred and nine C” the following words:-  ;or  sections three, 
five, or six of chapter two hundred and fifty-eight E;.